src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_1Syl_ta/dab/zi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = teta:te
! V_?
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:da V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:da N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:da ACT_COND_type ;
:d ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:d VNONFIN_m ;
:d VNONFIN_matoi ;! has -mine and matoi

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:z ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/dab/di/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = souta:sou
! V_souta
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:da V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:da N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:da ACT_COND_type ; 
:d ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:da VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
: V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:d ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_DVta/äb/i/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = sirtta:sird
! V_SIRTA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ä V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ä N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:ä ACT_COND_type ; 
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:ä VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_1Syl_DVta/ab/i/DVkaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = pörtta:pörd
! V_
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:a ACT_COND_type ; 
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:a VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:%^DEVOICE INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/cheb/chi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ adivoita:adivoi
! V_AMUNTA, kerata:kera
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:če V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:či N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:č ACT_COND_type ;
:če ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:če VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ; !CHECKME
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:č ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_1Syl_ta/cheb/chi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ loita:loi
! V_?
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:če V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:či N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:č ACT_COND_type ;
:č ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:č VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:č V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:č ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_da/cheb/chi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ dominoida:dominoi
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:če V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:či N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:č ACT_COND_type ;
:če ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:če VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_d/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:č ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_da/b/0/gaha
!! @LEXNAME@ adivoita:adivoi
! V_SUGIDA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
: V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N: N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type_NO_i ; 
ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT_NO_i ;! gets i

LEXICON V_da/eb/i/gaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = arvostelda:arvostel
! V_TULDA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_eda/eb/i/egaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = arvostelda:arvostel
! V_
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:e V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:i N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ;
:e ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:e VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:e V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:e INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/ndab/nzi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = henota:heno
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:nda V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:nda N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:nda ACT_COND_type ;
:nda ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:nda VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:nz ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = virigata:viriga
! V_VIRIGATA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:nde V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ndi N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:nd ACT_COND_type ;
:nde ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:nde VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:nz ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/neb/ni/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = harjeta:harje, pageta:page
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:ne V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg, NomAg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:ni N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
: ACT_COND_type ; 
 ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:ne VNONFIN_m ; !does not include -matoi 20241109

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:n ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i
