src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ajelda+V:ajel V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
elegata+V:elega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
elʼgeta+V:elʼge V_ta/ndab/nzi/kaha ;
erigata+V:eriga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
helegata+V:helega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
heragata+V:heraga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
heregata+V:herega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
herogata+V:heroga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
hüdegata+V:hüdega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
itkeškata+V:itkeška V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
johtutelda+V:johtutel V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
joudugata+V:jouduga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
kobegata+V:kobega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
kolda+V:kol V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
kulda+V:kul V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
käregata+V:kärega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
levigata+V:leviga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
läžegata+V:läžega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
melʼvilugata+V:melʼ#viluga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
mända+V:män V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
nenagata+V:nenaga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
nolda+V:nol V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
panda+V:pan V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
pidʼoitelda+V:pidʼoitel V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
purda+V:pur V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
rebigata+V:rebiga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
rougata+V:rouga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
sanelda+V:sanel V_da/eb/i/gaha ;!2013
sugida+V:sugi V_da/b/0/gaha ;
säbegata+V:säbega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
säregata+V:särega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
südegata+V:südega V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
tulda+V:tul V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
verda+V:ver V_da/eb/i/gaha ;
vilugata+V:viluga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
virigata+V:viriga V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
voikaškata+V:voikaška V_ta/ndeb/nzi/kaha ;
